Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 11

Aid to Disabled Persons — General Financial Assistance

71-4-1101. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Aid to the Disabled Act.”

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 18 (Williams, § 4765.170); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-401, 14-16-101.

Cross-References. Rental termination rights for the person with a physical disability, §66-7-110.

Statewide early intervention program for handicapped infants, toddlers, and their families, §49-10-702.

Law Reviews.

The Credibility Trap: Notes on a VA Evidentiary Standard, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 887 (2015).

71-4-1102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assistance” means money payments made to or in behalf of totally disabled persons in need, or medical care, or both, including hospitalization, outpatient care and treatment, nursing home care, drugs or any other type of remedial care recognized under state law in behalf of permanently and totally disabled persons in need, but does not include subdivisions (1)(A)-(1)(D) unless the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.), is amended to include one (1) or more of the following:

Any such payments to or care in behalf of any individual who is an inmate of a public institution, except as a patient in a medical institution, or any individual who is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Any such payments to any individual who has been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis and is a patient in a medical institution as a result of having tuberculosis or psychosis;

Any such care in behalf of any individual, who is a patient in a medical institution as a result of a diagnosis that such person has tuberculosis or psychosis, with respect to any period after the individual has been a patient in such an institution as a result of such diagnosis, for forty-two (42) days; or

Is not an inmate of any private institution except such private institution as has been approved by the department at the time of receiving assistance;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Permanently and totally disabled” means that the individual has been determined to have a permanent physical or mental impairment, disease or loss that substantially precludes the individual from engaging in useful occupations within the individual's competence, such as holding a job or homemaking. Such determinations shall be made in accordance with standards that shall be established by the department in consultation with an advisory committee, which committee shall include physicians nominated by the state medical society, and after review of the medical findings by a reviewing physician or physicians;

“Recipient” means a person who was receiving aid to the permanently and totally disabled benefits during the month of December, 1973, and is now qualified under Public Law 93-66 to continue to receive a state money payment as a supplement to the federally provided supplemental security income benefits; and

“Regional director” means the director of a region, or a designated agent in a county office, under chapter 1, part 1, of this title.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 1 (Williams, § 4765.153); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 15; 1965, ch. 9, § 1; 1973, ch. 337, § 3; 1974, ch. 628, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed), § 14-402; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-102.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 93-66, referred to in this section, may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 1402, 3121-3125, 6413, 6654 and in 42 U.S.C. §§ 402-415, 430, 1320, 1382, 1383, 1396A and 1396B and notes.

Cross-References. Rental termination rights for the person with a physical disability, §66-7-110.

71-4-1103. Eligibility for assistance.

Assistance shall be granted under this part to any permanently and totally disabled person who:

Is eighteen (18) years of age or older;

Is living within this state voluntarily and not for a temporary purpose, that is, with no intention of presently removing from the state; provided, that temporary absence from the state, with subsequent returns to the state or intent to return when the purposes of the absence have been accomplished, shall not, for the purpose of this part, interrupt continuity of residence;

Has not sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health, and whose spouse is not able to meet the person's needs as determined by the department's standards;

Is not an inmate of a public institution and:

Is not a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases; or

Is not a patient in a medical institution as a result of a diagnosis of tuberculosis or psychosis;

An inmate of any public institution ineligible under subdivision (4)(A) may, however, make application for such assistance, but the assistance, if granted, shall not begin until after such person ceases to be an inmate;

Within five (5) years immediately preceding application or during receipt of assistance, has not in order to evade any provision of this part made an assignment or transfer of property, the proceeds from which at the fair market value, irrespective of the actual consideration received, would under the state standards of need still be available to meet the needs of the individual. Any transfer of property to a husband, wife, son, daughter, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother, sister, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew or niece, within the period above mentioned, shall be prima facie evidence that the transfer was made with the intent to evade the provisions of this part;

Is not receiving for the same month old-age assistance, aid to the blind, or aid to dependent children;

Was receiving aid to the permanently and totally disabled benefits during the month of December 1973, and is now qualified under Public Law 93-66 to continue to receive a state money payment as a supplement to the federally-provided supplemental security income benefits.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 2 (Williams, § 4765.154); Acts 1955, ch. 30, § 1; 1955, ch. 125, § 1; 1957, ch. 81, § 3; 1957, ch. 116, § 2; 1965, ch. 9, § 2; 1967, ch. 51, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 487, § 1; 1974, ch. 628, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-403; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-103.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 93-66 referred to in this section may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 1402, 3121-3125, 6413, 6654 and in 42 U.S.C. §§ 402-415, 430, 1320, 1382, 1383, 1396A and 1396B and notes.

71-4-1104. Amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance that any person shall receive in the form of supplementary payments shall be determined by an application of § 212(a) of Public Law 93-66, and rules and regulations made by the department establishing standards of need and allowable resources to the recipient's present personal and economic circumstances.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 3 (Williams, § 4765.155); modified; Acts 1957, ch. 22, § 5; 1957, ch. 117, § 16; 1961, ch. 27, § 1; 1965, ch. 9, § 3; 1967, ch. 51, § 3; 1973, ch. 303, § 18; 1974, ch. 628, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-404, 14-16-104.

Compiler's Notes. Section 212(a) of Public Law 93-66 referred to in this section may be found in the notes following 42 U.S.C. § 1382.

71-4-1105. Duties of department.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance to the permanently and totally disabled under this part;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out this part to the end that equitable treatment shall be afforded to individuals in similar circumstances. All rules and regulations made by the department shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective regional directors;

Establish criteria for determining who is permanently and totally disabled within the meaning of § 71-4-1102;

Establish standards for the determination of need of the individual including:

Statewide requirements essential to maintaining a minimum standard of economic security based on studies of current living costs;

Methods and procedures for measuring income and resources against such statewide requirements;

Property reserves that will not preclude eligibility for assistance under this part;

Employ personnel for the administration of this part in conformity with title 8, chapter 30, and the rules and regulations of the department of human resources;

Prescribe the form of and supply to the regional directors such forms as it may deem necessary and desirable;

Cooperate with the commissioner of social security, or any federal officer or agency made successor to the commissioner of social security, in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid for assistance to the permanently and totally disabled and in conformity with this part, including the making of such reports in such form and containing such information as the commissioner of social security may from time to time require, and comply with such provisions as such commissioner may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and

Publish an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 4 (Williams, § 4765.156); modified; Acts 1973, ch. 303, § 19; 1974, ch. 628, § 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-405; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-105; Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (5), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

71-4-1106. Duties of regional directors.

The regional directors shall administer this part in the counties of their regions, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the department pursuant to this part, and shall report to the department at such times and in such manner as the department may direct.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 5 (Williams, § 4765.157); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-406; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-106.

71-4-1107. Appeal to department.

If any award of assistance is modified or cancelled under any provision of this part, the recipient may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by it.

The department shall, upon receipt of such an appeal, give the recipient reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 9 (Williams, § 4765.161); Acts 1973, ch. 303, § 21; 1974, ch. 628, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-411; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-107.

71-4-1108. Reconsideration of awards.

All assistance grants in the form of money payments made under this part shall be reconsidered by the regional director, or a designated agent, as frequently as may be required by the rules and regulations of the department.

After such further investigation as the regional director, or a designated agent, may deem necessary or the department may require, the amount of assistance in the form of money payments may be changed or assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the recipient's circumstances have altered to warrant such action.

A recipient shall submit to a reexamination as to such recipient's permanent and total disability when required to do so by the regional director, or a designated agent, or the department.

A recipient shall also furnish any information bearing on such recipient's eligibility required by the regional director, or a designated agent, or by the department.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 10 (Williams, § 4765.162); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 19; 1973, ch. 303, § 23; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-413; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-108.

71-4-1109. Notice of change of status by recipient.

If at any time during the continuance of assistance the recipient becomes possessed of any property or income in excess of the amount stated in the application, it shall be the duty of the recipient immediately to notify the county office of the receipt or possession of such property or income.

The regional director, or a designated agent, may, after investigation, either cancel the assistance or alter the amount of the money payments in accordance with the circumstances.

Any assistance paid after the recipient has come into possession of such property or income and in excess of such recipient's need as determined by the department's standards shall be recoverable in a suit by the state as a debt due to the state.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 11 (Williams, § 4765.163); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 20; 1961, ch. 17, § 1; 1974, ch. 628, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-414, 14-16-109.

71-4-1110. Removal of recipient from county.

Any recipient who moves to another county in this state shall be entitled with the approval of the department to receive assistance in the county to which the recipient has moved, and the regional director, or a designated agent, of the county from which the recipient has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the regional director, or a designated agent, of the county to which the recipient has moved.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 12 (Williams, § 4765.164); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-415, 14-16-110.

71-4-1111. Amendment of law.

All assistance granted under this part shall be deemed to be granted to be held subject to any amending or repealing act that may hereafter be passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of such recipient's assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing act.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 17 (Williams, § 4765.169); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-416; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-111.

71-4-1112. Assignment of benefits prohibited — Exemption from legal process.

Assistance granted under this part shall not be transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this part shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Acts 1953, ch. 16, § 8 (Williams, § 4765.160); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 14-417; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-112.

Law Reviews.

Exempt Property in Tennessee under the Bankruptcy Code (Thomas E. Ray), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1982).

71-4-1113. Fraudulent devices — Penalty.

A person who:

Knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any persons to obtain, by means of a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device, assistance to which such person is not entitled or assistance greater than that to which such person is justly entitled; or

With intent to defraud, aids or abets in buying or in any way disposing of the property, either personal or real, of a recipient of assistance, without the consent of the department;

commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1955, ch. 30, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-431, 14-16-113; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 106.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

71-4-1114. Charging disabled to file application — Illegal use of lists — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to directly or indirectly either charge or receive anything of value for assisting any person in making application to the proper authorities of this state, or any of them, for relief or assistance under this part.

It is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part, to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, any list of names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving aid to the permanently and totally disabled, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files or communications of the department or divisions of the department, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties, except as provided by §§ 71-1-117 and 71-1-118.

A person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1955, ch. 30, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A., § 14-432; Acts 1986, ch. 905, § 2; T.C.A., §14-16-114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-4-1115. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits in codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.